North Dakota statutes. TITLE 54 State Government
CHAPTER 54-34.4 Division of Tourism

54-34.4-01.
Division of tourism — Director.

The division of tourism is established to foster and promote tourism to, and within, the state and the full development of the state’s tourism resources and to serve as a planning and coordinating agency for tourism-related programs of the state and the state’s tourism partners. The director shall supervise and control the division of tourism.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 80, § 17; 2001, ch. 488, § 40; 2009, ch. 480, § 7.

54-34.4-02.
Duties of director.

The director of the department of commerce division of tourism, within the limits of legislative appropriations, shall:

Implement the state’s tourism policy;

Prepare and update annually a tourism marketing plan for the promotion and expansion of tourism in the state which identifies the state’s tourism resources, estimates the impact of tourism on the state’s economy, and proposes a marketing strategy for activities of the division;

Work with industry groups to prepare a long-term strategic plan each biennium;

Measure and forecast visitor volume, receipts, and related social and economic impacts;

Work with the private sector and local, state, and federal agencies to develop the state’s tourism-related infrastructure, facilities, services, and attractions, including the state’s highways, parks, and historic sites;

Organize and coordinate programs designed to promote tourism to, and within, the state through various means. Those means may include:

Print advertising in magazines, newspapers, and direct mail;

Advertising on radio, on television, online, in displays, or using other advertising media;

Publishing pamphlets, brochures, and other graphic and pictorial materials;

Designing the tourism side of the state highway map;

Aiding and assisting representatives of the media to ensure greater coverage of the state’s visitor attractions, events, and recreational opportunities; and

Other marketing activities and events aimed at increasing visitor volume;

Work with the department of transportation to improve visitor services along highways in the state and in state rest areas;

Develop opportunities for professional and technical education and training in the visitor industry;

Foster an understanding among the state’s residents of the economic importance to the state of hospitality and tourism;

Provide advice and technical assistance to local, public, and private tourism organizations in promoting and developing tourism; and

Monitor the policies and programs of state agencies that significantly affect the visitor industry, notify those agencies of the effects of their actions on travel to, and within the state, and if necessary recommend programs or policy changes to those agencies.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 80, § 17; 2001, ch. 488, § 41; 2009, ch. 480, § 8.

54-34.4-03.
State tourism policy.

The legislative assembly declares that:

This state is endowed with scenic beauty, historical sites, cultural resources, local festivals, attractions, recreational facilities, and a population whose ethnic diversity and traditions are attractive to visitors;

Tourism contributes to economic well-being by creating job opportunities, generating revenues for local businesses, and creating new wealth in the economy;

Tourism instills state pride and a sense of common interest among the state’s residents;

Tourism enhances the quality of life and well-being of the state’s residents by affording opportunities for recreation, new experiences, and relief from job stress;

Tourism advertising and marketing improves the image of North Dakota and helps educate and create awareness among residents and visitors alike;

Tourism promotes international understanding and good will, and contributes to intercultural appreciation;

The development of a strong and competitive state visitor industry depends upon the availability of trained personnel, necessary infrastructure, and a receptive climate for tourism investment; and

A comprehensive tourism policy is essential if tourism in the state is to grow in an orderly manner.

The legislative assembly declares it is the policy of this state to:

Promote and encourage the orderly growth and development of tourism to, and within, the state;

Promote the availability of reliable public highways and transport services between the state’s principal tourism destinations and the main tourism-generating markets;

Promote a sense of history in the state’s young people by encouraging family visits to state historic sites, and promoting the preservation and restoration of historic sites, trails, buildings, and districts;

Promote the mental, emotional, and physical well-being of the American people by encouraging outdoor recreational activities within the state;

Facilitate tourism to, and within, the state by developing an essential tourism infrastructure, providing investment incentives to tourism businesses, and encouraging city and county officials to plan for tourism needs and capitalize on local tourism resources;

Encourage the holding of conventions, trade shows, and expositions throughout the state;

Take measures to protect wildlife and natural resources in the preservation of geological, archaeological, and cultural treasures in tourist areas;

Encourage, assist, and coordinate when possible the tourism activities of local and area promotional organizations and tribes;

Provide hospitality training opportunities for frontline employees and provide resources to law enforcement personnel, border security, transportation security administration officials, and all state employees to assist, whenever possible, the tourism industry in helping visitors enjoy their North Dakota experience; and

Ensure that the tourism interest of the state is considered fully by state agencies and the legislative assembly in their deliberations; and harmonize to the maximum extent possible, all state activities in support of tourism with the needs of the general public, the political subdivisions of the state, and the visitor industry.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 80, § 17; 2009, ch. 480, § 9; 2011, ch. 439, § 1.

54-34.4-04.
North Dakota motion picture development office — Advisory board. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 480, § 16.

54-34.4-05.
Copyright and trademark.

The director of the department of commerce division of tourism may obtain copyright or trademark protection for anything that may be used to promote the policies listed in section 54-34.4-03. The director may license and charge a fee for photographs and logos and anything with copyright or trademark protection.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 44, § 20.